Missouri, session 2026, HB1971.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 559.125, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 559.125, to read as follows:
559.125. 1. The clerk of the court shall keep in a permanent file all applications for
probation or parole by the court, and shall keep in such manner as may be prescribed by the
court complete and full records of all presentence investigations requested, probations or
paroles granted, revoked or terminated and all discharges from probations or paroles. All
court orders relating to any presentence investigation requested and probation or parole
granted under the provisions of this chapter and sections 558.011 and 558.026 shall be kept in
a like manner, and, if the defendant subject to any such order is subject to an investigation or
is under the supervision of the division of probation and parole, a copy of the order shall be
sent to the division of probation and parole. In any county where a parole board ceases to
exist, the clerk of the court shall preserve the records of that parole board.
2. Information and data obtained by a probation or parole officer shall be privileged
information and shall not be receivable in any court. Such information shall not be disclosed
directly or indirectly to anyone other than the members of a parole board and the judge
entitled to receive reports, except the court, the division of probation and parole, or the parole
board may in its discretion permit the inspection of the report, or parts of such report, by the
defendant, or offender or his or her attorney, or other person having a proper interest therein.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1971 2
Information and data obtained by a probation or parole officer is privileged
information not receivable in any court unless for lawful criminal matters.
3. The provisions of subsection 2 of this section notwithstanding, the presentence
investigation report shall be made available to the state and all information and data obtained
in connection with preparation of the presentence investigation report may be made available
to the state at the discretion of the court upon a showing that the receipt of the information
and data is in the best interest of the state.
✔